Nebraska, session 109, LB406.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB406 LB406
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 2-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
2-1201 (1) There hereby is created a State Racing and Gaming
Commission. For purposes of sections 2-1201 to 2-1229, commission means
the State Racing and Gaming Commission.
(2) The commission shall consist of seven members who shall be
appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by a majority of
the members elected to the Legislature and may, after an opportunity to
be heard, be removed for cause by the Governor. A violation by a member
of the commission of section 2-1219 or any malfeasance, misfeasance, or
neglect in office shall be considered cause for removal. No person shall
be appointed to the commission, or continue to hold that office after
appointment, while holding any other office or position under the laws of
this state, any other state, or the United States. One member of the
commission shall be appointed from each congressional district, as such
districts existed on January 1, 2010, and four members of the commission
shall be appointed at large for terms as follows:
(a) The member representing the second congressional district who is
appointed on or after April 1, 2010, shall serve until March 31, 2014,
and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the
term of the member representing such district shall be four years and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified;
(b) The member representing the third congressional district who is
appointed on or after April 1, 2011, shall serve until March 31, 2015,
and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the
term of the member representing such district shall be four years and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified;
(c) The member representing the first congressional district who is
appointed on or after April 1, 2012, shall serve until March 31, 2016,
and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the
term of the member representing such district shall be four years and
-2-

LB406 LB406
2025 2025
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified;
(d) Not later than sixty days after July 15, 2010, the Governor
shall appoint one at-large member who shall serve until March 31, 2013,
and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the
term of such member shall be four years and until his or her successor is
appointed and qualified;
(e) Not later than sixty days after July 15, 2010, the Governor
shall appoint one at-large member who shall serve until March 31, 2014,
and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the
term of such member shall be four years and until his or her successor is
appointed and qualified; and
(f) Not later than sixty days after May 26, 2021, the Governor shall
appoint two additional at-large members who shall serve until March 31,
2025, and until their successors are appointed and qualified. One of such
members shall have experience in the Nebraska gaming industry, and one
shall have experience in the Nebraska horseracing industry. Thereafter
the terms of such at-large members shall be four years and until their
successors are appointed and qualified.
(3) Not more than four members of the commission shall belong to the
same political party. No more than three of the members shall reside,
when appointed, in the same congressional district. No more than two of
the members shall reside in any one county. Any vacancy shall be filled
by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term. The compensation
of the members of the commission shall be one thousand dollars per month,
which may be adjusted every two years in an amount not to exceed the
change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical
Workers for the period between June 30 of the first year to June 30 of
the year of adjustment. The members shall be reimbursed for expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in sections
81-1174 to 81-1177. The members of the commission shall be bonded or
insured as required by section 11-201.
-3-

LB406 LB406
2025 2025
(4) No member shall have any personal financial interest in any
licensed racetrack enclosure or authorized gaming operator as defined in
the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act for the duration of the member's term.
Sec. 2. Original section 2-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-